Massachusetts, session 194th, S1431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of section 2 of chapter 831 of the acts of 1977 is
hereby amended by striking out the words “one member of the cabinet, or his designee,
appointed by the governor” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “1 representative
of the Wampanoag Tribe of Gay Head Aquinnah, appointed by the Indian tribal government”.
SECTION 2. The fifth paragraph of said section 2, as appearing in said chapter 831, is
hereby amended by striking out the third sentence.
of 1